Florida, session 2026, SB1270.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 54 55 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2), paragraphs (a), 56 (e), (f), and (g) of subsection (3), and subsection (7) of 57 section 581.217, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph 58 (h) is added to subsection (3) and paragraph (e) is added to 59 subsection (12) of that section, to read: 60 581.217âState hemp program.â 61 (2)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.âThe Legislature finds that: 62 (b)âHemp and hemp extract Hemp-derived cannabinoids, 63 including, but not limited to, cannabidiol, are not controlled 64 substances or adulterants if they are in compliance with this 65 section. 66 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 67 (a)ââAttractive to childrenâ means manufactured in the 68 shape of or packaged in containers displaying humans, cartoons, 69 or animals, toys, or other features that appeal to children; 70 manufactured in a form or packaged in a container that bears any 71 reasonable resemblance to an existing candy or snack product 72 that is familiar to children; manufactured in a form or packaged 73 in a container that bears any reasonable resemblance to a the 74 public as a widely distributed, branded food product marketed to 75 children such that the a product could be mistaken for the 76 branded food product, especially by children; or containing any 77 color additives. 78 (e)ââHempâ means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part 79 of that plant, including the seeds thereof, and all derivatives, 80 extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of 81 isomers thereof, whether growing or not, that has a total delta 82 9-tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that does not exceed 0.3 83 percent on a dry-weight basis, with the exception of hemp 84 extract, which may not exceed 0.3 percent total delta-9 85 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration on a wet-weight basis, or 86 which may not exceed 2 milligrams per serving or 20 milligrams 87 per container on a wet-weight basis, whichever is less. 88 (f)ââHemp extractâ means hemp that is a substance or 89 compound intended for ingestion or inhalation and contains, 90 containing more than trace amounts of a cannabinoid but, or for 91 inhalation which is derived from or contains hemp and which does 92 not contain controlled substances listed in s. 893.03; any 93 quantity of synthetic cannabinoids; or delta-8 94 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol, 95 hexahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinol acetate, 96 tetrahydrocannabiphorol, or tetrahydrocannabivarin. The term 97 does not include hemp extract cannabidiol converted into delta 98 9-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10 99 tetrahydrocannabinol, or any other tetrahydrocannabinol isomers, 100 analogs, or derivatives. The term does not include synthetic 101 cannabidiol or seeds or seed-derived ingredients that are 102 generally recognized as safe by the United States Food and Drug 103 Administration. 104 (g)ââIndependent testing laboratoryâ means a laboratory 105 that: 106 1.âDoes not have a direct or indirect interest in the 107 entity whose product is being tested; 108 2.âDoes not have a direct or indirect interest in a 109 facility that cultivates, processes, distributes, dispenses, or 110 sells hemp or hemp extract in the state or in another 111 jurisdiction or cultivates, processes, distributes, dispenses, 112 or sells marijuana, as defined in s. 381.986; and 113 3.âIs accredited by a third-party accrediting body as a 114 competent testing laboratory pursuant to ISO/IEC 17025 of the 115 International Organization for Standardization and has been 116 certified by the department. 117 (h)ââTotal delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol concentrationâ 118 means a concentration calculated as follows: [delta-9 119 tetrahydrocannabinol] + (0.877 x [delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinolic 120 acid]). 121 (7)âMANUFACTURE, DELIVERY, HOLD, OFFER FOR SALE, 122 DISTRIBUTION, AND RETAIL SALE OF HEMP OR HEMP EXTRACT.â 123 (a)âHemp extract may only be manufactured, delivered, held, 124 offered for sale, distributed, or and sold in this the state if 125 the product: 126 1.âHas a certificate of analysis prepared by an independent 127 testing laboratory which that states: 128 a.âThe hemp extract is the product of a batch tested by the 129 independent testing laboratory; 130 b.âThe batch contained a total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol 131 concentration that did not exceed 0.3 percent pursuant to the 132 testing of a random sample of the batch. However, if the batch 133 is sold at retail, the batch must meet the total delta-9 134 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration limits set forth in paragraph 135 (3)(e) for hemp extract; 136 c.âThe batch does not contain contaminants unsafe for human 137 consumption; and 138 d.âThe batch was processed in a facility that holds a 139 current and valid permit issued by a human health or food safety 140 regulatory entity with authority over the facility, and that 141 facility meets the human health or food safety sanitization 142 requirements of the regulatory entity. Such compliance must be 143 documented by a report from the regulatory entity confirming 144 that the facility meets such requirements. 145 2.âIs manufactured, delivered, held, offered for sale, 146 distributed, or sold in a container that includes: 147 a.âA scannable barcode or quick response code linked to the 148 certificate of analysis of the hemp extract batch by an 149 independent testing laboratory; 150 b.âThe batch number; 151 c.âThe Internet address of a website where batch 152 information may be obtained; 153 d.âThe expiration date; and 154 e.âThe number of milligrams of each marketed cannabinoid 155 per serving; and 156 f.âThe toll-free telephone number for the national Poison 157 Help line. 158 3.âIs manufactured, delivered, held, offered for sale, 159 distributed, or sold in a container that: 160 a.âIs suitable to contain products for human consumption; 161 b.âIs composed of materials designed to minimize exposure 162 to light; 163 c.âMitigates exposure to high temperatures; 164 d.âIs not attractive to children; and 165 e.âIs compliant with the United States Poison Prevention 166 Packaging Act of 1970, 15 U.S.C. ss. 1471 et seq., without 167 regard to provided exemptions. 168 (b)âHemp extract may only be sold to a business or procured 169 by a business in this state if that business is properly 170 permitted as required by this section. Unpermitted business 171 sales, street sales, or festival sales are prohibited. A 172 business or food establishment may not possess hemp or hemp 173 extract products that are attractive to children. A business or 174 food establishment permitted to sell hemp or hemp extract may 175 not be located within 500 feet of a school or daycare facility, 176 a retail outlet engaged in the business of selling motor fuel, 177 or a retail facility in possession of a valid permit to sell 178 hemp or hemp extract. Businesses and food establishments 179 permitted to sell hemp or hemp extract: 180 1.âMay not advertise the availability of such products in a 181 manner that is visible to members of the public from any street, 182 sidewalk, park, or other public place. A business or food 183 establishment permitted to sell hemp extract may not use a trade 184 name, a logo, or advertising that contains wording or images 185 that are attractive to children; that implies that such products 186 confer health or medical benefits that are unsubstantiated; or 187 that suggests that the business or food establishment is 188 affiliated with a medical office or other health care facility. 189 Advertising may not use the terms âTHC,â âmedical card,â or 190 similar terms. All advertisements must be preapproved by the 191 department. 192 2.âShall keep records pertaining to lab testing results and 193 the suppliers of hemp extract products for a minimum of 3 years, 194 and shall have procedures in place to effect a recall of any 195 hemp extract later determined to be unsafe for human 196 consumption. 197 3.âShall store all such products out of reach of customers, 198 either in a controlled area accessible only to employees or in a 199 locked display case. 200 4.âAre subject to random, unannounced inspections by law 201 enforcement and the department. 202 (c)âHemp extract manufactured, delivered, held, offered for 203 sale, distributed, or sold in this state is subject to the 204 applicable requirements of chapter 500, chapter 502, or chapter 205 580. 206 (d)âProducts that are intended for human ingestion or 207 inhalation and that contain hemp extract, including, but not 208 limited to, snuff, chewing gum, and other smokeless products, 209 may not be sold in this state to a person who is under 21 years 210 of age. Hemp or hemp extract may not be sold in a form for 211 smoking. A person who violates this paragraph commits a 212 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 213 775.082 or s. 775.083. A person who commits a second or 214 subsequent violation of this paragraph within 1 year after the 215 initial violation commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, 216 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 217 Additionally, upon a third violation, the department shall 218 revoke the violatorâs license, permit, authorization, 219 certificate, or registration. 220 (e)âHemp extract possessed, manufactured, delivered, held, 221 offered for sale, distributed, or sold in violation of this 222 subsection by an entity regulated under chapter 500 is subject 223 to s. 500.172 and penalties as provided in s. 500.121. Hemp 224 extract products found to be mislabeled or attractive to 225 children are subject to an immediate stop-sale order. The 226 department may not grant permission to remove or use, except for 227 disposal, hemp extract products subject to a stop-sale order 228 which are attractive to children until the department determines 229 that the hemp extract products comply with state law. 230 (f)1.âAn event organizer may not promote, advertise, or 231 facilitate an event where: 232 a.âHemp extract products that do not comply with general 233 law, including hemp extract products that are not from an 234 approved source as provided in sub-subparagraph (a)1.d., are 235 sold or marketed; or 236 b.âHemp extract products are sold or marketed by businesses 237 that are not properly permitted as required by this section and 238 chapter 500. 239 2.âA person who violates this paragraph is subject to an 240 administrative fine in the Class IV category under s. 570.971 241 for each violation. 242 (12)âRULES.âThe department shall adopt rules to administer 243 the state hemp program. The rules must provide for: 244 (e)âThe certification of independent testing laboratories. 245 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 246 made by this act to section 581.217, Florida Statutes, in a 247 reference thereto, paragraph (n) of subsection (1) of section 248 500.03, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 249 500.03âDefinitions; construction; applicability.â 250 (1)âFor the purpose of this chapter, the term: 251 (n)ââFoodâ includes: 252 1.âArticles used for food or drink for human consumption; 253 2.âChewing gum; 254 3.âArticles used for components of any such article; 255 4.âArticles for which health claims are made, which claims 256 are approved by the Secretary of the United States Department of 257 Health and Human Services and which claims are made in 258 accordance with s. 343(r) of the federal act, and which are not 259 considered drugs solely because their labels or labeling contain 260 health claims; 261 5.âDietary supplements as defined in 21 U.S.C. s. 262 321(ff)(1) and (2); and 263 6.âHemp extract as defined in s. 581.217. 264 265 The term includes any raw, cooked, or processed edible 266 substance; ice; any beverage; or any ingredient used, intended 267 for use, or sold for human consumption. 268 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 269 made by this act to section 581.217, Florida Statutes, in a 270 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 893.02, Florida 271 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 272 893.02âDefinitions.âThe following words and phrases as used 273 in this chapter shall have the following meanings, unless the 274 context otherwise requires: 275 (3)ââCannabisâ means all parts of any plant of the genus 276 Cannabis, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin 277 extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, 278 manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the 279 plant or its seeds or resin. The term does not include 280 âmarijuana,â as defined in s. 381.986, if manufactured, 281 possessed, sold, purchased, delivered, distributed, or 282 dispensed, in conformance with s. 381.986. The term does not 283 include hemp as defined in s. 581.217 or industrial hemp as 284 defined in s. 1004.4473. 285 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 286 made by this act to section 581.217, Florida Statutes, in a 287 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 288 916.1085, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 289 916.1085âIntroduction or removal of certain articles 290 unlawful; penalty.â 291 (1)(a)âExcept as authorized by law or as specifically 292 authorized by the person in charge of a facility, it is unlawful 293 to introduce into or upon the grounds of any facility under the 294 supervision or control of the department or agency, or to take 295 or attempt to take or send therefrom, any of the following 296 articles, which are declared to be contraband for the purposes 297 of this section: 298 1.âAny intoxicating beverage or beverage which causes or 299 may cause an intoxicating effect; 300 2.âAny controlled substance as defined in chapter 893, 301 marijuana as defined in s. 381.986, hemp as defined in s. 302 581.217, or industrial hemp as defined in s. 1004.4473; 303 3.âAny firearm or deadly weapon; 304 4.âAny cellular telephone or other portable communication 305 device as described in s. 944.47(1)(a)6., intentionally and 306 unlawfully introduced inside the secure perimeter of any 307 forensic facility under the operation and control of the 308 department or agency. As used in this subparagraph, the term 309 âportable communication deviceâ does not include any device that 310 has communication capabilities which has been approved or issued 311 by the person in charge of the forensic facility; 312 5.âAny vapor-generating electronic device as defined in s. 313 386.203, intentionally and unlawfully introduced inside the 314 secure perimeter of any forensic facility under the operation 315 and control of the department or agency; or 316 6.âAny other item as determined by the department or the 317 agency, and as designated by rule or by written institutional 318 policies, to be hazardous to the welfare of clients or the 319 operation of the facility. 320 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 321 made by this act to section 581.217, Florida Statutes, in a 322 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 323 944.47, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 324 944.47âIntroduction, removal, or possession of contraband; 325 penalty.â 326 (1)(a)âExcept through regular channels as authorized by the 327 officer in charge of the correctional institution, it is 328 unlawful to introduce into or upon the grounds of any state 329 correctional institution, or to take or attempt to take or send 330 or attempt to send therefrom, any of the following articles 331 which are hereby declared to be contraband for the purposes of 332 this section, to wit: 333 1.âAny written or recorded communication or any currency or 334 coin given or transmitted, or intended to be given or 335 transmitted, to any inmate of any state correctional 336 institution. 337 2.âAny article of food or clothing given or transmitted, or 338 intended to be given or transmitted, to any inmate of any state 339 correctional institution. 340 3.âAny intoxicating beverage or beverage which causes or 341 may cause an intoxicating effect. 342 4.âAny controlled substance as defined in s. 893.02(4), 343 marijuana as defined in s. 381.986, hemp as defined in s. 344 581.217, industrial hemp as defined in s. 1004.4473, or any 345 prescription or nonprescription drug having a hypnotic, 346 stimulating, or depressing effect. 347 5.âAny firearm or weapon of any kind or any explosive 348 substance. 349 6.âAny cellular telephone or other portable communication 350 device intentionally and unlawfully introduced inside the secure 351 perimeter of any state correctional institution without prior 352 authorization or consent from the officer in charge of such 353 correctional institution. As used in this subparagraph, the term 354 âportable communication deviceâ means any device carried, worn, 355 or stored which is designed or intended to receive or transmit 356 verbal or written messages, access or store data, or connect 357 electronically to the Internet or any other electronic device 358 and which allows communications in any form. Such devices 359 include, but are not limited to, portable two-way pagers, hand 360 held radios, cellular telephones, Blackberry-type devices, 361 personal digital assistants or PDAâs, laptop computers, or any 362 components of these devices which are intended to be used to 363 assemble such devices. The term also includes any new technology 364 that is developed for similar purposes. Excluded from this 365 definition is any device having communication capabilities which 366 has been approved or issued by the department for investigative 367 or institutional security purposes or for conducting other state 368 business. 369 7.âAny vapor-generating electronic device as defined in s. 370 386.203, intentionally and unlawfully introduced inside the 371 secure perimeter of any state correctional institution. 372 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 373 made by this act to section 581.217, Florida Statutes, in a 374 reference thereto, paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section 375 951.22, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 376 951.22âCounty detention facilities; contraband articles.â 377 (1)âIt is unlawful, except through regular channels as duly 378 authorized by the sheriff or officer in charge, to introduce 379 into or possess upon the grounds of any county detention 380 facility as defined in s. 951.23 or to give to or receive from 381 any inmate of any such facility wherever said inmate is located 382 at the time or to take or to attempt to take or send therefrom 383 any of the following articles, which are contraband: 384 (h)âAny narcotic, hypnotic, or excitative drug or drug of 385 any kind or nature, including nasal inhalators, sleeping pills, 386 barbiturates, marijuana as defined in s. 381.986, hemp as 387 defined in s. 581.217, industrial hemp as defined in s. 388 1004.4473, or controlled substances as defined in s. 893.02(4). 389 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 390 made by this act to section 581.217, Florida Statutes, in a 391 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 392 985.711, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 393 985.711âIntroduction, removal, or possession of certain 394 articles unlawful; penalty.â 395 (1)(a)âExcept as authorized through program policy or 396 operating procedure or as authorized by the facility 397 superintendent, program director, or manager, a person may not 398 introduce into or upon the grounds of a juvenile detention 399 facility or commitment program, or take or send, or attempt to 400 take or send, from a juvenile detention facility or commitment 401 program, any of the following articles, which are declared to be 402 contraband under this section: 403 1.âAny unauthorized article of food or clothing given or 404 transmitted, or intended to be given or transmitted, to any 405 youth in a juvenile detention facility or commitment program. 406 2.âAny intoxicating beverage or any beverage that causes or 407 may cause an intoxicating effect. 408 3.âAny controlled substance as defined in s. 893.02(4), 409 marijuana as defined in s. 381.986, hemp as defined in s. 410 581.217, industrial hemp as defined in s. 1004.4473, or any 411 prescription or nonprescription drug that has a hypnotic, 412 stimulating, or depressing effect. 413 4.âAny firearm or weapon of any kind or any explosive 414 substance. 415 5.âAny cellular telephone or other portable communication 416 device as described in s. 944.47(1)(a)6., intentionally and 417 unlawfully introduced inside the secure perimeter of any 418 juvenile detention facility or commitment program. As used in 419 this subparagraph, the term âportable communication deviceâ does 420 not include any device that has communication capabilities which 421 has been approved or issued by the facility superintendent, 422 program director, or manager. 423 6.âAny vapor-generating electronic device as defined in s. 424 386.203, intentionally and unlawfully introduced inside the 425 secure perimeter of any juvenile detention facility or 426 commitment program. 427 7.âAny currency or coin given or transmitted, or intended 428 to be given or transmitted, to any youth in any juvenile 429 detention facility or commitment program. 430 8.âAny cigarettes, as defined in s. 210.01(1), or tobacco 431 products, as defined in s. 210.25, given, or intended to be 432 given, to any youth in a juvenile detention facility or 433 commitment program. 434 Section 8.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $2 435 million in nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the General 436 Revenue Fund to the Department of Law Enforcement for the 437 purchase of testing equipment necessary to implement this act. 438 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.